src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-motokáán_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mo'tokaani - ok : # -m inanimate noun, head AEW NA1
     mo'tokaani+NI+Sg: mo'tokaani
     mo'tokaani+NI+Pl: mo'tokaanistsi
     mo'tokaani+NI+Non: mo'tokaani
     
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ no'tokaani, no'tokaanimi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ no'tokaanistsi, no'tokaanimistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ no'tokaani, no'tokaanimi ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ no'tokaaninnaani, no'tokaaniminnaani ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ no'tokaaninnaanistsi, no'tokaaniminnaanistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ no'tokaaninnaani, no'tokaaniminnaani ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ ko'tokaaninnooni, ko'tokaaniminnooni ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ ko'tokaaninnoonistsi, ko'tokaaniminnoonistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ ko'tokaaninnooni, ko'tokaaniminnooni ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ ko'tokaani, ko'tokaanimi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ ko'tokaanistsi, ko'tokaanimistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ ko'tokaani, ko'tokaanimi ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ ko'tokaanoaawayi, ko'tokaanimoaawayi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ ko'tokaanoaawaistsi, ko'tokaanimoaawaistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ ko'tokaanoaawai, ko'tokaanimoaawai ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ o'tokaani, o'tokaanimi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ o'tokaanistsi, o'tokaanimistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ o'tokaani, o'tokaanimi ]

     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ o'tokaanoaawayi, o'tokaanimoaawayi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ o'tokaanoaawaistsi, o'tokaanimoaawaistsi ]
     mo'tokaani+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ o'tokaanoaawai, o'tokaanimoaawai ]
